West Virginia, session 2026, HB5135.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 67. Food waste task force. §16-67-1. Food Waste Task Force established. (a) There is established in the Department of Health the Food Waste Task Force, which shall be responsible for identifying and examining and making recommendations for legislative or executive action with regard to reducing food waste in this state, including, but not limited to the factors that lead to food waste in the state, and identifying strategies, policies, and legislative and executive actions that may be used to:(1) Prevent food waste;(2) Increase food donations;(3) Provide consumers with education on food storage;(4) Lower unreasonably high cosmetic standards for fruit and vegetables;(5) Cease or significantly reduce the rejection of even marginally imperfect-looking food;(6) Build statewide systems to distribute surplus edible food to charities;(7) Eliminate unnecessary state statutes or regulations that contribute to food waste; and(8) Modify "best by" food labels, consistent with uniform national standards, to inform consumers the latest possible date food can be safely consumed.(b) The work undertaken by the task force shall supplement and be consistent with existing efforts and commitments to reduce food waste, including food donation efforts, composting efforts, date labeling efforts, and effective inventory management practices, which have been, or are being, undertaken at the national level pursuant to a uniform, nationwide model. (c) The task force shall consist of 12 members to be appointed representatives from the Department of Health, the Department of Agriculture, the Legislature, and member of the public representing organizations combating hunger or food waste in the state. (d) The task force shall organize as soon as practicable following the appointment of its members and shall select a chairperson from among its membership. The chairperson shall appoint a secretary who need not be a member of the task force.(e) Members of the task force shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the task force, within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the task force for its purposes.(f) The task force may call to its assistance and avail itself of the services of the employees of any state, county, or municipal department, board, bureau, commission, or agency as it may require and as may be available to it for its purposes.(g) The Department of Human Services shall provide staff support to the task force.(h) No later than one year after organization, the task force shall submit to the Governor, and to the Legislature a report of its findings and recommendations for legislative, executive, or other action as may be appropriate to reduce food waste in this state.  The task force shall expire upon submission of its report.